Washington statutes.
RCW 19.120.050

Purchase of real estate and improvements owned by refiner-supplier—Retailer given right of first refusal—Notice to retailer.

Notwithstanding the terms of any motor fuel franchise, the motor fuel retailer shall be given the right of first refusal to purchase the real estate and/or improvements owned by the refiner-supplier at the franchise location, and at least thirty days' advance notice within which to exercise this right, prior to any sale thereof to any other buyer.

[ 1986 c 320 s 6.]